North Dakota, session 69, HB1382.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 39-04-19.2 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. In addition to all other fees required under this chapter for registration of a motor
vehicle, the department shall collect at the beginning of each annual registration
period:
a. An electric vehicle road use fee of one hundred twenty one hundred - fifty dollars
for each electric vehicle registered.
b. A plug-in hybrid vehicle road use fee of fiftysixty dollars for each plug-in hybrid
vehicle registered.
c. An electric motorcycle road use fee of twenty - five dollars for each electric
motorcycle registered.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-27-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 1 25.1043.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
54-27-19. Highway tax distribution fund - State treasurer to make allocation to state,
counties, and cities.
A highway tax distribution fund is created as a special fund in the state treasury into which
must be deposited . Except as provided in section 3 of this Act, al l the moneys available by law
from collections of motor vehicle registration and related fees, fuels taxes, special fuels taxes,
use taxes, and special fuels excise taxes must be deposited in the fund. The state treasurer
shall transfer the first five million five hundred thousand dollars per biennium from the highway
tax distribution fund to the state highway fund for the purpose of providing administrative
assistance to other transferees. After the transfer of the first five million five hundred thousand
dollars, any moneys in the highway tax distribution fund must be allocated and transferred
monthly by the state treasurer, as follows:
1. Sixty-one and three-tenths percent must be transferred monthly to the state
department of transportation and placed in a state highway fund.
2. Two and seven-tenths percent must be transferred monthly to the township highway
fund.
3. One and five-tenths percent must be transferred monthly to the public transportation
fund.
4. Thirty-four and five-tenths percent must be allocated to the counties of this state in
proportion to the number of vehicle registrations credited to each county. Each county
must be credited with the certificates of title of vehicles registered by residents of the
county. The state treasurer shall compute and distribute the counties' share monthly
after deducting the incorporated cities' share. All the moneys received by the counties
from the highway tax distribution fund must be set aside in a separate fund called the
"highway tax distribution fund" and must be appropriated and applied solely for
highway purposes in accordance with section 11 of article X of the Constitution of
North Dakota. The state treasurer shall compute and distribute monthly the sums
allocated to the incorporated cities within each county according to the formulas in this
subsection using the incorporated cities' populations as determined by the last official
regular or special federal census or the census taken in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 40-02 in case of a city incorporated subsequent to the census.
Page No. 2 25.1043.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. For counties having no cities with a population of ten thousand or more, twenty-
seven percent of the total county allocation must be distributed to all of the
incorporated cities within the county on a countywide per capita basis. The
remaining county allocation amount must be transferred into the county highway
tax distribution fund.
b. For each county having a city with a population of ten thousand or more, the
amount transferred each month into the county highway tax distribution fund
must be the difference between the amount allocated to that county pursuant to
this subsection and the total amount allocated and distributed to the incorporated
cities in that county as computed according to the following formula:
(1) A statewide per capita average as determined by calculating twenty-seven
percent of the amount allocated to all of the counties under this subsection
divided by the total population of all of the incorporated cities in the state.
(2) The share distributed to each city in the county having a population of less
than one thousand must be determined by multiplying the population of that
city by the product of 1.50 times the statewide per capita average computed
under paragraph 1.
(3) The share distributed to each city in the county having a population of one
thousand to four thousand nine hundred ninety-nine, inclusive, must be
determined by multiplying the population of that city by the product of 1.25
times the statewide per capita average computed under paragraph 1.
(4) The share distributed to each city in the county having a population of five
thousand or more must be determined by multiplying the population of that
city by the statewide per capita average for all such cities, which per capita
average must be computed as follows: the total of the shares computed
under paragraphs 2 and 3 for all cities in the state having a population of
less than five thousand must be subtracted from the total incorporated cities'
share in the state as computed under paragraph 1 and the balance
remaining must then be divided by the total population of all cities of five
thousand or more in the state.
Page No. 3 25.1043.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. The moneys allocated to the incorporated cities must be distributed to them monthly
by the state treasurer and must be deposited by the cities in a separate fund and may
only be used in accordance with section 11 of article X of the Constitution of North
Dakota and an incorporated city may use the fund for the construction, reconstruction,
repair, and maintenance of public highways within or outside the city pursuant to an
agreement entered into between the city and any other political subdivision as
authorized by section 54-40-08.
SECTION 3. A new section to chapter 54-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
City, county, and township road fund.
1. There is created in the state treasury the city, county, and township road fund. The
fund consists of three cents per gallon [3.79 liters] of the tax assessed under
subsection 1 of section 57 - 43.1 - 02 and subsection 1 of section 57 - 43.2 - 02 .
2. The state treasurer shall allocate and distribute two - thirds of moneys in the fund to
non-oil-producing counties and cities in non - oi l - producing counties for the purpose o f
funding road infrastructure using the highway tax distribution fund formula established
in subsection 4 of section 54 - 27 - 19 .
3. The state treasurer shall allocate one - third of moneys in the fund to non - oi l - producing
counties for the benefit of organized and unorganized townships in non - oi l - producing
counties for township road and bridge purposes using the formula established in
section 54 - 27 - 19.4 .
4. For purposes of this section, "non - oi l - producing county" means a county that received
no allocation of funding or a total allocation of less than five million dollars under
subsection 2 of section 57 - 51 - 15 in the most recently completed even-numbered fisca l
year before the start of each biennium.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-43.1-02 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a tax of twenty-three twenty - six cents per
gallon [3.79 liters] is imposed on all motor vehicle fuel sold or used in this state.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-43.2-02 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 4 25.1043.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an excise tax of twenty-three twenty - six
cents per gallon [3.79 liters] is imposed on the sale or delivery of all special fuel sold or
used in this state. For the purpose of determining the tax upon compressed natural
gas and liquefied natural gas under this section, one hundred twenty cubic feet [3.40
cubic meters] of compressed natural gas, and one and seven-tenths gallons [6.44
liters] of liquefied natural gas is equal to one gallon [3.79 liters] of other special fuel.
SECTION 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 4 and 5 of this Act are effective for taxable
events occurring after June 30, 2025.
Page No. 5 25.1043.02000